Alaska, session 34, SB18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.33 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Article 5. Wireless Telecommunications Devices. 06 Sec. 14.33.300. Wireless telecommunications device policy. (a) The 07 department shall develop and adopt a model policy that prohibits the use of nonschool- 08 issued wireless telecommunications devices in public schools during regular school 09 hours, including lunch and passing periods. The policy may allow an exception for 10 students to use a wireless telecommunications device for emergency purposes. 11 (b) Each school district shall adopt a policy that prohibits students from 12 possessing or using a nonschool-issued wireless telecommunications device during 13 regular school hours, including lunch and passing periods. Each school district shall 14 share this policy with parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and school 01 employees. The policy may allow an exception for students to use a wireless 02 telecommunications device for emergency purposes. A school district may either 03 develop and adopt its own policy or adopt the model policy developed under (a) of this 04 section. 05 (c) In this section, "wireless telecommunications device" means any portable 06 wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data 07 communication between two or more parties. 08 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.